Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-1206
Tax; delinquent; penalty; interest.

If the tax provided for in section 9-1203 is not paid within such time as provided in section 9-1205 or as may be prescribed for payment thereof by rules and regulations prescribed by the commission, the same shall become delinquent and a penalty of ten percent shall be added thereto, together with interest at the rate specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted, until paid.

Initiative Law 2020, No. 431, § 6;

Laws 2021, LB561, § 44;

Laws 2022, LB876, § 23;

Laws 2025, LB357, § 20.